Washington statutes.
RCW 41.07.030

Costs.

The costs of administering, maintaining, and operating the central personnel-payroll system shall be distributed to the using state agencies. In order to insure proper and equitable distribution of costs the office of financial management shall utilize cost accounting procedures to identify all costs incurred in the administration, maintenance, and operation of the central personnel-payroll system. In order to facilitate proper and equitable distribution of costs to the using state agencies the office of financial management is authorized to utilize the statewide information technology system maintenance and operations revolving account created by RCW 43.41.442.

[ 2019 c 146 s 2. Prior: 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 611; 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 442; 1975 1st ex.s. c 239 s 3.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.19.003.